Montana, session 2025, SB330.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Montana blockchain and digital innovation task force -- membership -- duties --
reporting. (1) There is a Montana blockchain and digital innovation task force administered by the department
of administration.
(2) The task force consists of:
(a) the attorney general or the attorney general's designee;
(b) the state auditor or the state auditor's designee;
(c) seven members appointed by the president of the senate, except as provided in subsection
(2)(c)(i), including:
(i) three members of the senate, with one member appointed by the minority leader of the senate;
(ii) two members who have experience in:
(A) blockchain;
(B) cryptocurrency;
(C) financial technology; or
(D) digital innovation technology; and
(iii) two additional members, one of whom is a representative of a business trade association;
(d) seven members appointed by the speaker of the house, except as provided in subsection
(2)(d)(i), including:
(i) three members of the house of representatives, with one member appointed by the minority
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 330
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 330
leader of the house;
(ii) two members who have experience in:
(A) blockchain;
(B) cryptocurrency;
(C) financial technology; or
(D) digital innovation technology; and
(iii) two additional members, one of whom is a broker-dealer regulated under Title 30, chapter 10;
and
(e) five members appointed by the governor, including:
(i) two members with experience in:
(A) blockchain;
(B) cryptocurrency;
(C) financial technology; or
(D) digital innovation technology; and
(ii) three additional members, one of whom is from a financial service institution regulated under
Title 32, chapter 1.
(3) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house shall each select one legislator
appointed pursuant to subsections (2)(c)(i) and (2)(d)(i) to serve as cochairpersons of the task force.
(4) Members must be appointed within 30 days after [the effective date of this act]. All member
terms occur from the time of appointment until December 31, 2026. If a vacancy occurs in the membership of
the task force, the member must be replaced in the same manner in which the original appointment was made.
(5) (a) Except as provided in subsection (5)(b), members may not receive reimbursement for
salary or expenses.
(b) Legislative members of the panel must be compensated and receive travel expenses as
provided for in 2-15-124 for each day in attendance at task force meetings or in the performance of any duty or
service as a task force member.
(6) (a) A majority of the members of the task force constitutes a quorum.
(b) The action of a majority of a quorum constitutes an action of the task force.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 330
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 330
(7) The task force shall:
(a) develop knowledge and expertise regarding issues pertaining to blockchain, financial
technology, and digital innovation technology; and
(b) develop and introduce recommendations regarding policy pertaining to:
(i) the promotion in the state of the adoption of blockchain, financial technology, and digital
innovation;
(ii) the development of nonfinancial incentives for industries in the state related to blockchain,
financial technology, and digital innovation;
(iii) the promotion of partnerships with existing financial institutions and regulated financial service
entities with respect to blockchain, financial technology, and digital innovation; and
(iv) the regulation in the state of blockchain, financial technology, and digital innovation.
(8) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to the economic affairs interim
committee and the legislative council by July 1, 2026.
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
Section 3. Termination. [Section 1] terminates December 31, 2026.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 330
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 330, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 330
INTRODUCED BY G. LAMMERS, V. RICCI, W. GALT, S. NOVAK, M. LEE, M. NIKOLAKAKOS, S. KELLY, S.
KLAKKEN, P. STRAND, T. CROWE, E. ALBUS, J. SECKINGER, K. LOVE, G. OVERSTREET, P. ELVERUM,
R. GREGG, C. NEUMANN, L. BENNETT, C. SCHOMER, E. TILLEMAN, D. ZOLNIKOV, D. BEDEY, M.
CUFFE, M. DUNWELL, J. ELLSWORTH, B. GILLESPIE, G. HUNTER, E. MATTHEWS, W. MCKAMEY, N.
NICOL, T. RUNNING WOLF, F. SMITH, R. TEMPEL, D. FERN, D. HARVEY, J. KASSMIER, D. LOGE, L.
SMITH, J. WINDY BOY, M. YAKAWICH, R. MINER, G. OBLANDER, B. BARKER, D. BAUM, E. BOLDMAN, P.
FLOWERS, D. HAWK, E. KERR-CARPENTER, F. MANDEVILLE, T. MCGILLVRAY, B. MITCHELL, S.
MORIGEAU, C. POPE, L. REKSTEN, J. TREBAS, T. TEZAK, J. DARLING, B. PHALEN, J. LYNCH, V.
MOORE
AN ACT CREATING THE MONTANA BLOCKCHAIN AND DIGITAL INNOVATION TASK FORCE; PROVIDING
MEMBERSHIP REQUIREMENTS AND DUTIES; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE AND A
TERMINATION DATE.